Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.02
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, the definitions found in sections 60-1401.03 to 60-1401.40, 60-1401.42, and 60-1401.43 apply.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 248, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 18;

Laws 1984, LB 825, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 280, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 388;

Laws 1993, LB 200, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 564, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1035, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 903, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1018, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 563, § 34;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 256;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB50, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 14;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 40;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 113.

Terms of dealer's license do not require dealer to provide safe tools for dealer's employees. Durand v. Western Surety Co., 245 Neb. 649, 514 N.W.2d 840 (1994).